ja: 互換性のあるライセンスプレートの穴パターン: 粘着式/穴なし; ヒッチレシーバーマウント; 穴あけ不要; スロット付き/調整可能穴; 標準2穴 (水平); 標準4穴; 牽引フックネジ込み式マウント; その他
fi: Yhteensopiva rekisterikilven reikäkuvio: Liima / ei reikiä; Vetokoukkukiinnitys; Ei vaadi poraamista; Urareiät / säädettävät reiät; Vakio 2-reikäinen (vaaka); Vakio 4-reikäinen; Hinaussilmukan kierrekiinnitys; Muu
en: Compatible license plate hole pattern: Adhesive/no-hole; Hitch receiver mount; No-drill required; Slotted/adjustable holes; Standard 2-hole (horizontal); Standard 4-hole; Tow hook threaded mount; Other
zh-CN: 适配车牌安装孔位规格: 背胶/无孔; 拖车接收器安装; 免打孔; 槽孔/可调孔; 标准 2 孔（水平）; 标准 4 孔; 拖车钩螺纹安装; 其他
tr: Uyumlu plaka deliği düzeni: Yapışkanlı/deliksiz; Çeki demiri alıcı montajı; Delme gerektirmez; Oluklu/ayarlanabilir delikler; Standart 2 delikli (yatay); Standart 4 delikli; Çeki demiri dişli montajı; Diğer
pt-PT: Padrão de furos da matrícula compatível: Adesivo/sem furos; Montagem em recetor de engate; Sem necessidade de furos; Furos ranhurados/ajustáveis; Padrão de 2 furos (horizontal); Padrão de 4 furos; Montagem roscada em gancho de reboque; Outro
hu: Kompatibilis rendszámtábla-furatmintázat: Ragasztós/lyuk nélküli; Vonóhorog-foglalatra szerelhető; Nem igényel fúrást; Hornyolt/állítható lyukak; Szabványos 2 lyukú (vízszintes); Szabványos 4 lyukú; Vontatószem menetes rögzítés; Egyéb
pl: Kompatybilny układ otworów tablicy rejestracyjnej: Samoprzylepne / bez otworów; Mocowanie do haka holowniczego; Bez konieczności wiercenia; Otwory wzdłużne / regulowane; Standardowe z 2 otworami (poziome); Standardowe z 4 otworami; Gwintowane mocowanie do ucha holowniczego; Inne
zh-TW: 相容車牌孔位樣式: 黏貼/無孔; 拖車底座安裝; 免鑽孔; 開槽/可調式孔; 標準雙孔 (水平); 標準四孔; 拖車鉤螺紋安裝; 其他
es: Patrón de orificios de placa de identificación compatible: Adhesivo/sin agujero; Montaje en el receptor del enganche; No requiere perforación; Agujeros ranurados/ajustables; Estándar de 2 agujeros (horizontal); Estándar de 4 agujeros; Montaje roscado de gancho de remolque; Otro
cs: Kompatibilní vzor otvorů pro registrační značku: Nalepovací / bez děr; Montáž na tažné zařízení; Nevyžaduje vrtání; Drážkované/nastavitelné otvory; Standardní se 2 otvory (horizontální); Standardní se 4 otvory; Závitová montáž na tažné oko; Jiné
lt-LT: Suderinamas numerio lentelės skylių išdėstymas: Klijuojamas / be skylių; Tvirtinimas prie kablio; Nereikia gręžti; Pailgos / reguliuojamos skylės; Standartinės 2 skylės (horizontaliai); Standartinės 4 skylės; Tvirtinimas prie tempimo kilpos sriegio; Kita
ko: 호환 번호판 장착 구멍 패턴: 접착식/무타공; 히치 리시버 마운트; 드릴 작업 불필요; 슬롯형/조절식 타공; 표준 2홀(수평); 표준 4홀; 견인 고리 스레드 마운트; 기타
da: Kompatibelt nummerplade-hulmønster: Klæbende/uden huller; Montering på anhængertræk; Kræver ikke boring; Aflange/justerbare huller; Standard med 2 huller (vandret); Standard med 4 huller; Gevindmontering til trækkrog; Andet
th: รูปแบบรูยึดป้ายทะเบียนที่เข้ากันได้: แบบกาว/ไม่เจาะรู; ยึดกับหัวลาก; ไม่ต้องเจาะ; รูสล็อต/ปรับได้; มาตรฐาน 2 รู (แนวนอน); มาตรฐาน 4 รู; ยึดเกลียวหูลาก; อื่นๆ
el: Συμβατό μοτίβο οπών πινακίδας κυκλοφορίας: Αυτοκόλλητη/χωρίς τρύπες; Βάση κοτσαδόρου; Δεν απαιτείται τρύπημα; Με εγκοπές/ρυθμιζόμενες τρύπες; Κανονική με 2 τρύπες (οριζόντια); Κανονική με 4 τρύπες; Βιδωτή βάση σε γάντζο ρυμούλκησης; Άλλο
vi: Mẫu lỗ biển số tương thích: Dán/không có lỗ; Gắn ngàm kéo; Không cần khoan; Lỗ rãnh/có thể điều chỉnh; Tiêu chuẩn 2 lỗ (ngang); Tiêu chuẩn 4 lỗ; Gắn lỗ móc kéo có ren; Khác
ro-RO: Model compatibil de orificiu pentru placa de identificare: Adeziv/fără găuri; Montură pentru cârlig de remorcare; Nu necesită găurire; Găuri alungite/ajustabile; Standard cu 2 găuri (orizontal); Standard cu 4 găuri; Montură filetată pentru cârlig de remorcare; Altele
fr: Entraxe de fixation de plaque d’immatriculation compatible: Adhésif/sans trou; Support pour attelage; Sans perçage requis; Trous oblongs/réglables; Standard 2 trous (horizontal); Standard 4 trous; Support fileté pour crochet d'attelage; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilni uzorak rupa za registarsku pločicu: Ljepilo / bez rupa; Nosač za kuku; Bušenje nije potrebno; Prorezane/prilagodljive rupe; Standardne 2 rupe (vodoravno); Standardne 4 rupe; Navojni nosač za kuku za vuču; Ostalo
nb: Kompatibelt hullmønster for nummerskilt: Klebende / ingen hull; Tilhengerfestemontering; Krever ikke boring; Sporete/justerbare hull; Standard 2-hulls (horisontalt); Standard 4-hulls; Gjenget slepekrokfeste; Annet
pt-BR: Padrão de furos da placa de licença compatível: Adesivo/sem furo; Suporte para engate; Não é necessário furar; Furos com fenda/ajustáveis; Padrão 2 furos (horizontal); Padrão 4 furos; Suporte rosqueado para gancho de reboque; Outro
sk-SK: Kompatibilný vzor otvorov pre tabuľku s evidenčným číslom vozidla: Lepiaci/bez otvorov; Upevnenie na ťažné zariadenie; Nevyžaduje sa vŕtanie; Štrbinové/nastaviteľné otvory; Štandardné 2 otvory (horizontálne); Štandardné 4 otvory; Závitové upevnenie na ťažný hák; Iné
bg-BG: Съвместима конфигурация на отворите за регистрационен номер: Залепващ/без отвори; Монтаж на теглича; Не се изисква пробиване; Прорезни/регулируеми отвори; Стандартни 2 отвора (хоризонтално); Стандартни 4 отвора; Монтаж на резбата на куката за теглене; Друго
nl: Compatibele kentekenplaat gatenpatroon: Zelfklevend/geen gaten; Bevestiging voor trekhaak; Boren niet nodig; Gleufgaten/verstelbare gaten; Standaard 2 gaten (horizontaal); Standaard 4 gaten; Bevestiging met schroefdraad voor trekoog; Overig
ru: Совместимая схема отверстий номерного знака: На клею / без отверстий; Крепление на фаркоп; Сверление не требуется; Слоты / регулируемые отверстия; Стандартное с 2 отверстиями (горизонтальное); Стандартное с 4 отверстиями; Резьбовое крепление на буксировочный крюк; Другое
sv: Kompatibelt hålmönster för registreringsskylt: Självhäftande/utan hål; Montering på dragkrok; Kräver ingen borrning; Spårade/justerbara hål; Standard med 2 hål (horisontell); Standard med 4 hål; Gängat fäste för bogserögla; Övrigt
de: Kompatibles Lochmuster für Kennzeichen: Klebstoff/Ohne Bohrung; Montage an Anhängerkupplung; Kein Bohren erforderlich; Geschlitzt/verstellbare Löcher; Standard-2-Loch (horizontal); Standard-4-Loch; Befestigung am Abschlepphakengewinde; Sonstige
it: Schema di fori compatibile per targhe identificative: Adesivo/senza fori; Supporto per gancio di traino; Senza foratura; Fori asolati/regolabili; Standard a 2 fori (orizzontale); Standard a 4 fori; Supporto filettato per gancio di traino; Altro
sl-SI: Kompatibilen vzorec lukenj za registrsko tablico: Lepilno/brez lukenj; Montaža na vlečno kljuko; Vrtanje ni potrebno; Zarezane/nastavljive luknje; Standardno, 2 luknji (vodoravno); Standardno, 4 luknje; Montaža na navoj vlečne kljuke; Drugo